algorithms/arabic.sbl
/*
 * Authors:
 * - Assem Chelli, < assem [dot] ch [at] gmail >
 * - Abdelkrim Aries <ab [underscore] aries [at] esi [dot] dz>
 *
 * ---
 *
 * Arabic language stemmer
 *
 * Source obtained from https://github.com/snowballstem/snowball/blob/master/algorithms/arabic.sbl,
 * under the BSD public license, created by Assem Chelli & Abdelkrim Aries.
 */

stringescapes { }

/* the Arabic letters in Unicode */
// Hamza
stringdef o     hex '621' // Hamza
stringdef ao    hex '623' // Hamza above Alef
stringdef ao_   hex '625' // Hamza below Alef
stringdef a~    hex '622' // Alef madda
stringdef wo    hex '624' // Hamza above waw
stringdef yo    hex '626' // Hamza above yeh

// Letters
stringdef a     hex '627' // Alef
stringdef a_    hex '649' // Alef Maksura
stringdef b     hex '628' // Beh
stringdef t_    hex '629' // Teh_Marbuta
stringdef t     hex '62a' // Teh
stringdef th    hex '62b' // Theh
stringdef j     hex '62c' // Jeem
stringdef h     hex '62d' // Hah
stringdef x     hex '62e' // Khah
stringdef d     hex '62f' // Dal
stringdef dz    hex '630' // Thal
stringdef r     hex '631' // Reh
stringdef z     hex '632' // Zain
stringdef s     hex '633' // Seen
stringdef sh    hex '634' // Sheen
stringdef c     hex '635' // Sad
stringdef dh    hex '636' // Dad
stringdef tt    hex '637' // Tah
stringdef zh    hex '638' // Zah
stringdef i     hex '639' // Ain
stringdef gh    hex '63a' // Ghain
stringdef f     hex '641' // Feh
stringdef q     hex '642' // Qaf
stringdef k     hex '643' // Kaf
stringdef l     hex '644' // Lam
stringdef m     hex '645' // Meem
stringdef n     hex '646' // Noon
stringdef e     hex '647' // Heh
stringdef w     hex '648' // Waw
stringdef y     hex '64a' // Yeh

// Diacritics
stringdef aan   hex '64b' // FatHatan
stringdef uun   hex '64c' // Dammatan
stringdef iin   hex '64d' // Kasratan
stringdef aa    hex '64e' // FatHa
stringdef uu    hex '64f' // Damma
stringdef ii    hex '650' // Kasra
stringdef oo    hex '652' // Sukun
stringdef ~     hex '651' // Shadda

// Hindu–Arabic numerals
stringdef 0     hex '0660'
stringdef 1     hex '0661'
stringdef 2     hex '0662'
stringdef 3     hex '0663'
stringdef 4     hex '0664'
stringdef 5     hex '0665'
stringdef 6     hex '0666'
stringdef 7     hex '0667'
stringdef 8     hex '0668'
stringdef 9     hex '0669'
stringdef %     hex '066a'  // PERCENT
stringdef .     hex '066b'  // DECIMAL
stringdef '     hex '066c'  // THOUSANDS

// Kasheeda
stringdef _     hex '640' // Kasheeda, Tatweel

// Ponctuation marks
stringdef ,   hex '060C' // COMMA
stringdef ;   hex '061B' // SEMICOLON
stringdef ?   hex '061F' // QUESTION

// Shaped forms
stringdef o1     hex  'fe80'  // HAMZA
stringdef ao1    hex  'fe83'  // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef ao2    hex  'fe84'  // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef ao_1   hex  'fe87'  // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef ao_2   hex  'fe88'  // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef yo1    hex  'fe8b'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo2    hex  'fe8c'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo3    hex  'fe89'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef yo4    hex  'fe8a'  // YEH_HAMZA
stringdef a~1    hex  'fe81'  // ALEF_MADDA
stringdef a~2    hex  'fe82'  // ALEF_MADDA
stringdef wo1    hex  'fe85'  // WAW_HAMZA
stringdef wo2    hex  'fe86'  // WAW_HAMZA
stringdef a1     hex  'fe8d'  // ALEF
stringdef a2     hex  'fe8e'  // ALEF
stringdef b1     hex  'fe8f'  // BEH
stringdef b2     hex  'fe90'  // BEH
stringdef b3     hex  'fe91'  // BEH
stringdef b4     hex  'fe92'  // BEH
stringdef t_1    hex  'fe93'  // TEH_MARBUTA
stringdef t_2    hex  'fe94'  // TEH_MARBUTA
stringdef t1     hex  'fe97'  // TEH
stringdef t2     hex  'fe98'  // TEH
stringdef t3     hex  'fe95'  // TEH
stringdef t4     hex  'fe96'  // TEH
stringdef th1    hex  'fe9b'  // THEH
stringdef th2    hex  'fe9c'  // THEH
stringdef th3    hex  'fe9a'  // THEH
stringdef th4    hex  'fe99'  // THEH
stringdef j1     hex  'fe9f'  // JEEM
stringdef j2     hex  'fea0'  // JEEM
stringdef j3     hex  'fe9d'  // JEEM
stringdef j4     hex  'fe9e'  // JEEM
stringdef h1     hex  'fea3'  // HAH
stringdef h2     hex  'fea4'  // HAH
stringdef h3     hex  'fea1'  // HAH
stringdef h4     hex  'fea2'  // HAH
stringdef x1     hex  'fea7'  // KHAH
stringdef x2     hex  'fea8'  // KHAH
stringdef x3     hex  'fea5'  // KHAH
stringdef x4     hex  'fea6'  // KHAH
stringdef d1     hex  'fea9'  // DAL
stringdef d2     hex  'feaa'  // DAL
stringdef dz1    hex  'feab'  // THAL
stringdef dz2    hex  'feac'  // THAL
stringdef r1     hex  'fead'  // REH
stringdef r2     hex  'feae'  // REH
stringdef z1     hex  'feaf'  // ZAIN
stringdef z2     hex  'feb0'  // ZAIN
stringdef s1     hex  'feb3'  // SEEN
stringdef s2     hex  'feb4'  // SEEN
stringdef s3     hex  'feb1'  // SEEN
stringdef s4     hex  'feb2'  // SEEN
stringdef sh1    hex  'feb7'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh2    hex  'feb8'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh3    hex  'feb5'  // SHEEN
stringdef sh4    hex  'feb6'  // SHEEN
stringdef c1     hex  'febb'  // SAD
stringdef c2     hex  'febc'  // SAD
stringdef c3     hex  'feb9'  // SAD
stringdef c4     hex  'feba'  // SAD
stringdef dh1    hex  'febf'  // DAD
stringdef dh2    hex  'fec0'  // DAD
stringdef dh3    hex  'febd'  // DAD
stringdef dh4    hex  'febe'  // DAD
stringdef tt1    hex  'fec3'  // TAH
stringdef tt2    hex  'fec4'  // TAH
stringdef tt3    hex  'fec1'  // TAH
stringdef tt4    hex  'fec2'  // TAH
stringdef zh1    hex  'fec7'  // ZAH
stringdef zh2    hex  'fec8'  // ZAH
stringdef zh3    hex  'fec5'  // ZAH
stringdef zh4    hex  'fec6'  // ZAH
stringdef i1     hex  'fecb'  // AIN
stringdef i2     hex  'fecc'  // AIN
stringdef i3     hex  'fec9'  // AIN
stringdef i4     hex  'feca'  // AIN
stringdef gh1    hex  'fecf'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh2    hex  'fed0'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh3    hex  'fecd'  // GHAIN
stringdef gh4    hex  'fece'  // GHAIN
stringdef f1     hex  'fed3'  // FEH
stringdef f2     hex  'fed4'  // FEH
stringdef f3     hex  'fed1'  // FEH
stringdef f4     hex  'fed2'  // FEH
stringdef q1     hex  'fed7'  // QAF
stringdef q2     hex  'fed8'  // QAF
stringdef q3     hex  'fed5'  // QAF
stringdef q4     hex  'fed6'  // QAF
stringdef k1     hex  'fedb'  // KAF
stringdef k2     hex  'fedc'  // KAF
stringdef k3     hex  'fed9'  // KAF
stringdef k4     hex  'feda'  // KAF
stringdef l1     hex  'fedf'  // LAM
stringdef l2     hex  'fee0'  // LAM
stringdef l3     hex  'fedd'  // LAM
stringdef l4     hex  'fede'  // LAM
stringdef m1     hex  'fee3'  // MEEM
stringdef m2     hex  'fee4'  // MEEM
stringdef m3     hex  'fee1'  // MEEM
stringdef m4     hex  'fee2'  // MEEM
stringdef n1     hex  'fee7'  // NOON
stringdef n2     hex  'fee8'  // NOON
stringdef n3     hex  'fee5'  // NOON
stringdef n4     hex  'fee6'  // NOON
stringdef e1     hex  'feeb'  // HEH
stringdef e2     hex  'feec'  // HEH
stringdef e3     hex  'fee9'  // HEH
stringdef e4     hex  'feea'  // HEH
stringdef w1     hex  'feed'  // WAW
stringdef w2     hex  'feee'  // WAW
stringdef a_1    hex  'feef'  // ALEF_MAKSURA
stringdef a_2    hex  'fef0'  // ALEF_MAKSURA
stringdef y1     hex  'fef3'  // YEH
stringdef y2     hex  'fef4'  // YEH
stringdef y3     hex  'fef1'  // YEH
stringdef y4     hex  'fef2'  // YEH

// Ligatures Lam-Alef
stringdef la      hex  'fefb' // LAM_ALEF
stringdef la2     hex  'fefc' // LAM_ALEF
stringdef lao     hex  'fef7' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef lao2    hex  'fef8' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
stringdef lao_    hex  'fef9' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef lao_2   hex  'fefa' // LAM_ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
stringdef la~     hex  'fef5' // LAM_ALEF_MADDA_ABOVE
stringdef la~2    hex  'fef6' // LAM_ALEF_MADDA_ABOVE



integers (
            word_len
         )

booleans (
            is_noun
            is_verb
            is_defined
         )

routines (
    Prefix_Step1
    Prefix_Step2
    Prefix_Step3a_Noun
    Prefix_Step3b_Noun
    Prefix_Step3_Verb
    Prefix_Step4_Verb

    Suffix_All_alef_maqsura
    Suffix_Noun_Step1a
    Suffix_Noun_Step1b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2a
    Suffix_Noun_Step2b
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c1
    Suffix_Noun_Step2c2
    Suffix_Noun_Step3
    Suffix_Verb_Step1
    Suffix_Verb_Step2a
    Suffix_Verb_Step2b
    Suffix_Verb_Step2c

    Normalize_post
    Normalize_pre

    Checks1
)

externals ( stem )

groupings (  )


// Normalizations
define Normalize_pre as (
    loop len (
        (
            [substring] among (
                '{aan}' '{uun}' '{iin}' '{aa}' '{uu}' '{ii}' '{oo}' '{~}'( delete ) // strip vocalization
                '{_}' ( delete ) // strip kasheeda

                // Ponctuation marks
                '.' ',' ';' ':'  '?' '!' '/' '*' '%' '\' '"' ( delete) // General
                '{,}' '{;}' '{?}'  ( delete ) // Arabic-specific

                // Hindu–Arabic numerals
                '{0}' ( <- '0')
                '{1}' ( <- '1')
                '{2}' ( <- '2')
                '{3}' ( <- '3')
                '{4}' ( <- '4')
                '{5}' ( <- '5')
                '{6}' ( <- '6')
                '{7}' ( <- '7')
                '{8}' ( <- '8')
                '{9}' ( <- '9')
                '{%}' '{.}' '{'}' ( delete )

                // Shaped forms
                '{o1}' ( <- '{o}' ) // HAMZA
                '{ao1}' '{ao2}'  ( <- '{ao}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
                '{ao_1}' '{ao_2}' ( <- '{ao_}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
                '{yo1}'  '{yo2}' '{yo3}'  '{yo4}'  ( <- '{yo}' ) // YEH_HAMZA
                '{a~1}'  '{a~2}'( <- '{a~}' ) // ALEF_MADDA
                '{wo1}' '{wo2}'( <- '{wo}' ) // WAW_HAMZA
                '{a1}' '{a2}' ( <- '{a}' ) // ALEF
                '{b1}' '{b2}' '{b3}'  '{b4}'  ( <- '{b}' ) // BEH
                '{t_1}'  '{t_2}' ( <- '{t_}' ) // TEH_MARBUTA
                '{t1}'   '{t2}' '{t3}' '{t4}'  ( <- '{t}' ) // TEH
                '{th1}' '{th2}' '{th3}' '{th4}' ( <- '{th}' ) // THEH
                '{j1}' '{j2}'  '{j3}' '{j4}'(  <- '{j}' ) // JEEM
                '{h1}' '{h2}' '{h3}' '{h4}' ( <- '{h}' ) // HAH
                '{x1}' '{x2}' '{x3}' '{x4}'( <- '{x}' ) // KHAH
                '{d1}'  '{d2}'  ( <- '{d}' ) // DAL
                '{dz1}''{dz2}' ( <- '{dz}' ) // THAL
                '{r1}' '{r2}'( <- '{r}' ) // REH
                '{z1}' '{z2}'  ( <- '{z}' ) // ZAIN
                '{s1}'  '{s2}'   '{s3}' '{s4}'( <- '{s}' ) // SEEN
                '{sh1}' '{sh2}' '{sh3}' '{sh4}' ( <- '{sh}' ) // SHEEN
                '{c1}' '{c2}' '{c3}' '{c4}'( <- '{c}' ) // SAD
                '{dh1}'    '{dh2}'   '{dh3}'  '{dh4}'( <- '{dh}' ) // DAD
                '{tt1}'  '{tt2}'  '{tt3}'  '{tt4}' ( <- '{tt}' ) // TAH
                '{zh1}' '{zh2}' '{zh3}'    '{zh4}'( <- '{zh}' ) // ZAH
                '{i1}' '{i2}' '{i3}'  '{i4}'( <- '{i}' ) // AIN
                '{gh1}' '{gh2}' '{gh3}'  '{gh4}'( <- '{gh}' ) // GHAIN
                '{f1}'  '{f2}' '{f3}'  '{f4}' ( <- '{f}' ) // FEH
                '{q1}' '{q2}' '{q3}' '{q4}' ( <- '{q}' ) // QAF
                '{k1}' '{k2}' '{k3}'  '{k4}'( <- '{k}' ) // KAF
                '{l1}' '{l2}' '{l3}' '{l4}'( <- '{l}' ) // LAM
                '{m1}' '{m2}'  '{m3}' '{m4}'   ( <- '{m}' ) // MEEM
                '{n1}'  '{n2}' '{n3}'  '{n4}'( <- '{n}' ) // NOON
                '{e1}' '{e2}' '{e3}' '{e4}' ( <- '{e}' ) // HEH
                '{w1}'  '{w2}'  ( <- '{w}' ) // WAW
                '{a_1}' '{a_2}' ( <- '{a_}' ) // ALEF_MAKSURA
                '{y1}' '{y2}' '{y3}' '{y4}' ( <- '{y}' ) // YEH

                // Ligatures Lam-Alef
                '{la}'  '{la2}'     (<- '{l}{a}')
                '{lao}'  '{lao2}'   (<- '{l}{ao}')
                '{lao_}'  '{lao_2}' (<- '{l}{ao_}')
                '{la~}'  '{la~2}'    (<- '{l}{a~}')

            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

define Normalize_post as (

    do (
        // normalize last hamza
        backwards (
        [substring] among (
            '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{o}')
        '{wo}' ( <- '{o}')
        '{yo}' ( <- '{o}')
        )
        )
    )
